src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
! ==================== !
!! # Adjective morphology !
! ==================== !

!! ## Ad hoc lexica

!LEXICON zl1 ! TODO check -- done
!l1 ;

!LEXICON zl26 ! TODO check
!l26 ;

!! ## The lexicons

! LEXICON l0 ! stigbend hjáorð, t.d. norður
!   l0pos  ;
  
! LEXICON l0pos
!  +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:  # ;
!  +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:  # ;
!  +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:  # ;
!  +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:  # ;
!  +A+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:  # ;
!  +A+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:  # ;
!  +A+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:  # ;
!  +A+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:  # ;
!  +A+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:  # ;
!  +A+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:  # ;
!  +A+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:  # ;
!  +A+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:  # ;
!  +A+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:  # ;
!  +A+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:  # ;
!  +A+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:  # ;
!  +A+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:  # ;
!  +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:  # ;
!  +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:  # ;
!  +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:  # ;
!  +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:  # ;
!  +A+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:  # ;
!  +A+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:  # ;
!  +A+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:  # ;
!  +A+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:  # ;
!  +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def:    # ;
!  +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def:    # ;
!  +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def:    # ;
!  +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def:    # ;
!  +A+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def:    # ;
!  +A+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def:    # ;
!  +A+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def:    # ;
!  +A+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def:    # ;
!  +A+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def:    # ;
!  +A+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:    # ;
!  +A+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:    # ;
!  +A+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def:    # ;
!  +A+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def:    # ;
!  +A+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def:    # ;
!  +A+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:    # ;
!  +A+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def:    # ;
!  +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def:    # ;
!  +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def:    # ;
!  +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def:    # ;
!  +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def:    # ;
!  +A+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def:    # ;
!  +A+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def:    # ;
!  +A+Neu+Pl+Dat+Def:    # ;
!  +A+Neu+Pl+Gen+Def:    # ;
 
! LEXICON l0_1
!  l0pos ;
!  l0_1comsup ;
 
! LEXICON l0_1comsup
!  +A: Comp_Ri ;
 
! LEXICON l0_2
!  l0pos ;
!  l0_2comsup ;

! LEXICON l0_2comsup
!  +A: Comp_Ari ;

! LEXICON l0_def
!  l0pos ;
!  +A: Pos_Def ;

LEXICON l1 
!!= **@LEXNAME@**  ríkur
 +A: zl1pos ;
 +A: zl1comsup ;

!LEXICON l1pos
! +A: zl1pos ;

LEXICON zl1pos
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
  Sg_Msc1  ;
  Pl_Msc1  ;
  Sg_Fem1  ;
  Pl_Fem1  ;
  Sg_Neu1  ;
  Pl_Neu1  ;
  Pos_Def  ;

LEXICON zl1comsup
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
  Comp_Ari ;

LEXICON l1_umlaut 
!!= **@LEXNAME@**  tungur
+A: zl1_umlaut ;

LEXICON zl1_umlaut
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
  zl1pos ;
  :^IUML Comp_Ri ;

LEXICON l1_2 ! djúpur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
   zl1_2 ;

LEXICON zl1_2
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
  :úp l1 ;
+A:yp Comp_Ri ;
  
LEXICON l1_ØÆumlaut ! høgur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+A: zl1_ØÆumlaut ;
LEXICON zl1_ØÆumlaut ! høgur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 :øg Sg_Msc1  ;
 :øg Pl_Msc1  ;
 :øg Sg_Fem1  ;
 :øg Pl_Fem1  ;
 :øg Sg_Neu1  ;
 :øg Pl_Neu1  ;
 :øg Pos_Def  ;
 :æg Comp_Ri  ;

LEXICON l1_1
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+A: zl1_1 ;

LEXICON zl1_1
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 :ring Sg_Msc1  ;
 :ring Pl_Msc1  ;
 :ring Sg_Fem1  ;
 :ring Pl_Fem1  ;
 :ring Sg_Neu1  ;
 :ring Pl_Neu1  ;
 :ring Pos_Def  ;
 :ver Comp_Ri  ;
 :ring SAri ;
 
LEXICON l1/12_ll
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 l1 ;
 l12_ll ;
 
LEXICON l1/24
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 l1 ;
 l24 ;

LEXICON l2 ! leysur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+A: zl2 ;
LEXICON zl2 ! leysur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
  Sg_Msc2   ;
  Pl_Msc2   ;
  Sg_Fem2   ;
  Pl_Fem2   ;
  Sg_Neu2   ;
  Pl_Neu2   ;
  Pos_Def   ;
  Comp_Ari  ;


LEXICON l1/9
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 l1 ;
 l9 ;

LEXICON l3 ! ...ligur:...lig
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+A+Der/Adv+Adv:%>a # ;
l1 ; ! XXX Det brukte å vere l1 i basen


LEXICON l5/21
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 l5 ;
 l21 ;


LEXICON l5	
!!= **@LEXNAME@**  spiltur
+A: zl5pos ;
+A: zl5comsup ;

!LEXICON l5pos
!+A: zl5pos ;

LEXICON zl5 
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 zl5pos ;
 zl5comsup ;


LEXICON zl5pos
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
  Sg_Msc1   ;
  Pl_Msc2	;
  Sg_Fem2   ;
  Pl_Fem2   ;
  Sg_Neu3	;
  Pl_Neu2	;
  Pos_Def	;
 
LEXICON zl5comsup 
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
  Comp_Ari	;
 
LEXICON l6	! brekaður
!!= **@LEXNAME@** adding +A and going to zl6
+A: zl6 ;

LEXICON zl6 	! brekaður
!!= **@LEXNAME@** from PrfPtc and A to cases
  Sg_Msc1    ;
  Pl_Msc1	;
  Sg_Fem1    ;
  Pl_Fem1    ;
  Sg_Neu3	;
  Pl_Neu1	;
  Pos_Def	;
  Comp_Ari	;

LEXICON l6_umlaut ! skaftur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+A: zl6_umlaut ;

LEXICON zl6_umlaut ! skaftur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
  Sg_Msc1_Uuml ;
  Pl_Msc1_Uuml ;
  Sg_Fem1_Uuml ;
  Pl_Fem1_Uuml ;
  Sg_Neu3_Uuml ;
  Pl_Neu1_Uuml ;
  Pos_Def2	  ;
  Comp_Ari	  ;

LEXICON l7	! blindur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+A: zl7 ;

LEXICON zl7	! blindur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 :%>d Sg_Msc1   ;
 :%>d Pl_Msc2	;
 :%>d Sg_Fem2   ;
 :%>d Pl_Fem2   ;
 +Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>t 	  # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>t	  # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>dum  # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ds	  # ;
 :%>d Pl_Neu2	;
 :%>d Pos_Def	;
 :%>d Comp_Ari	;

LEXICON l8	! kaldur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+A: zl8 ;
LEXICON zl8	! kaldur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 :d Sg_Msc1_Uuml ;
 +Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>dum	# ;
 :d Pl_Msc1_Uuml ;
 +Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>dum 	# ;
 :d Sg_Fem1_Uuml ;
 +Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>d		# ;
 :d Pl_Fem1_Uuml ;
 +Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>dum	# ;
 +Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>t	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>t	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>dum	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>dum	# ;
 +Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ds	 # ;
 :d Pl_Neu1_Uuml ;
 +Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>dum	# ;
 :d Pos_Def2	   ;
 :d Comp_Ari ;

LEXICON l9	! spakur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+A: zl9 ;
LEXICON zl9	! spakur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
  Sg_Msc1_Uuml ;
  Pl_Msc2_Uuml ;
  Sg_Fem2_Uuml ;
  Pl_Fem2_Uuml ;
  Sg_Neu1_Uuml ;
  Pl_Neu2_Uuml ;
  Pos_Def2	  ;
  Comp_Ari	  ;

LEXICON l10 
!!= **@LEXNAME@**  drúgvur
+A: zl10 ;
LEXICON zl10 ! drúgvur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:vur	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:van	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:vum	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:s	 	 # ;
 :v Pl_Msc1	;
 :v Sg_Fem1   ;
 :v Pl_Fem1   ;
 +Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>t 	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>t	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>vum	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s	 # ;
 :v Pl_Neu1	;
 :v Pos_Def	;
 :v Comp_Ari	;

LEXICON l10_m ! grúsommur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+A: zl10_m ;
LEXICON zl10_m ! grúsommur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 :m Sg_Msc1   ;
 :m Pl_Msc1	;
 :m Sg_Fem1   ;
 :m Pl_Fem1   ;
 +Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>t 	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>t	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>mum	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s	 # ;
 :m Pl_Neu1	;
 :m Pos_Def	;
 :m Comp_Ari	;

LEXICON l11 ! flógvur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+A: zl11 ;
LEXICON zl11 ! flógvur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:gvur	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:gvan	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:gvum	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:s	 	 # ;
 :gv Pl_Msc1	 ;
 :gv Sg_Fem1   ;
 :gv Pl_Fem1   ;
 +Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>tt 	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>tt	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>gvum	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s	 # ;
 :gv Pl_Neu1	;
 :gv Pos_Def	;
 :gv Comp_Ari	;

LEXICON l12_ll ! snjallur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+A: zl12_ll ;
LEXICON zl12_ll ! snjallur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>lur	 		 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>lan 		 	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>lum	 	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s	 	 	 # ;
 :l Pl_Msc1_Uuml ;
 :l Sg_Fem1_Uuml ;
 :l Pl_Fem1_Uuml ;
 +Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>t	     	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>t	    	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>lum	 	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s	 		 # ;
 :l Pl_Neu1_Uuml ;
 :l Pos_Def2	   ;
 :l Comp_Ari	   ;

LEXICON l12_ss ! hvassur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>sur			 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>san			 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>sum		 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s			 # ;
 +A:s Pl_Msc1_Uuml ;
 +A:s Sg_Fem1_Uuml ;
 +A:s Pl_Fem1_Uuml ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>t			 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>t			 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>sum		 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s			 # ;
 +A:s Pl_Neu1_Uuml ;
 +A:s Pos_Def2	  ;
 +A:s Comp_Ari	  ;

LEXICON l12_pp ! knappur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>pur	 		 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>pan	 		 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>pum		 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s	 		 # ;
 +A:p Pl_Msc1_Uuml ;
 +A:p Sg_Fem1_Uuml ;
 +A:p Pl_Fem1_Uuml ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>t	    	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>t	    	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>pum	 	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s	 		 # ;
 +A:p Pl_Neu1_Uuml ;
 +A:p Pos_Def2	   ;
 +A:p Comp_Ari	   ;
