src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Shortadjectives
hagur+CmpNP/None:hag l1/9 ;
LEXICON Adjectives
situativur:situativ l1 ;
atdjúpur:at#dj l1_2 ;
álvarstungur:álvars#tung l1_umlaut ;
barðhøgur:barð#h l1_ØÆumlaut ;
berghøgur:berg#h l1_ØÆumlaut ;
bládjúpur:blá#dj l1_2 ;
botndjúpur:botn#dj l1_2 ;
bráðdjúpur:bráð#dj l1_2 ;
byrðatungur:byrðatung l1_umlaut ;
djúpur:dj l1_2 ;
dýrabarur:dýrabar l1 ;
fjallhøgur:fjall#h l1_ØÆumlaut ;
gleðitungur:gleðitung l1_umlaut ;
grátsøtur:grátsøt l1 ;
gróðrarringur:gróðrar# l1_1 ;
grundarringur:grundar# l1_1 ;
grundringur:grund# l1_1 ;
hagaringur:haga# l1_1 ;
hamartungur:hamartung l1_umlaut ;
havdjúpur:hav#dj l1_2 ;
hálvringur:hálv# l1_1 ;
heilsuringur:heilsu# l1_1 ;
heljardjúpur:heljar#dj l1_2 ;
himmalhøgur:himmal#h l1_ØÆumlaut ;
hitatungur:hitatung l1_umlaut ;
høvuðtungur:høvuðtung l1_umlaut ;
inndjúpur:inn#dj l1_2 ;
javndjúpur:javn#dj l1_2 ;
kavlinur:kavlin l1 ;
kvøldtungur:kvøldtung l1_umlaut ;
manshøgur:mans#h l1_ØÆumlaut ;
margklókur:margklók l1 ;
meinljósur:meinljós l2 ;
móringur:mó# l1_1 ;
neytahøgur:neyta#h l1_ØÆumlaut ;
regntungur:regntung l1_umlaut ;
reyðgulur:reyðgul l1 ;
risahøgur:risa#h l1_ØÆumlaut ;
seyðhøgur:seyð#h l1_ØÆumlaut ;
sjóringur:sjó# l1_1 ;
vokalur:vokal l1 ;
táratungur:táratung l1_umlaut ;
tindhøgur:tind#h l1_ØÆumlaut ;
veðurringur:veður# l1_1 ;
verkfúsur:verkfús l2 ;
bláfrystur:blá#fryst l5 ;
einbeintur:ein#beint l5 ;
gleiðbeintur:gleið#beint l5 ;
hvasstentur:hvasstent l5 ;
lørutur:lørut l5 ;
sammerktur:sammerkt l5 ;
laminalur:laminal l1 ;
tálgutur:tálgut l5 ;
einskilaður:einskilað l6 ;
harðlívaður:harðlívað l6 ;
kápulitaður:kápulitað l6 ;
ómaktaður:ómaktað l6 ;
sáreggjaður:sáreggjað l6 ;
tríkantaður+Err/Orth:trýkantað l6 ;
eyðgjørdur:eyðgjør l7 ;
hátíðarkendur:hátíðarken l7 ;
líkdæmdur:líkdæm l7 ;
ótilgjørdur:ótilgjør l7 ;
sorgarkendur:sorgarken l7 ;
útvendur:útven l7 ;
einfaldur:einfal l8 ;
flísalagdur:flísalag l8 ;
hálvkaldur:hálvkal l8 ;
ísaglerakaldur:ísaglerakal l8 ;
kenslukaldur:kenslukal l8 ;
sagdur:sag l8 ;
tvífaldur:tvífal l8 ;
beinklænur:beinklæn l9 ;
elaklænur:elaklæn l9 ;
hjartasvakur:hjartasvak l9 ;
klænur:klæn l9 ;
naskur:nask l9 ;
pillsvakur:pillsvak l9 ;
smalur:smal l9 ;
stigjavnur:stigjavn l9 ;
bljúgvur:bljúg l10 ;
blúgvur:blúg l10 ;
drjúgvur:drjúg l10 ;
eydnudrúgvur:eydnudrúg l10 ;
happadrúgvur:happadrúg l10 ;
matdrúgvur:matdrúg l10 ;
máldrúgvur:máldrúg l10 ;
ódrúgvur:ódrúg l10 ;
flógvur:fló l11 ;
hálvflógvur:hálvfló l11 ;
órógvur:óró l11 ;
ótrúgvur:ótrú l11 ;
rógvur:ró l11 ;
skyldutrúgvur:skyldutrú l11 ;
tortrúgvur:tortrú l11 ;
trúgvur:trú l11 ;
bakhallur:bakhal l12_ll ;
bráðhvassur:bráðhvas l12_ss;
egghvassur:egghvas l12_ss;
eiturhvassur:eiturhvas l12_ss;
eysturhallur:eysturhal l12_ll ;
halahvassur:halahvas l12_ss;
hárhvassur:hárhvas l12_ss;
hugsnjallur:hugsnjal l12_ll ;
hvappur:hvap l12_pp;
hvassur:hvas l12_ss;
knappur:knap l12_pp;
knívhvassur:knívhvas l12_ss;
krappur:krap l12_pp;
lagghallur:lagghal l12_ll ;
løgghallur:løgghal l12_ll ;
nakkakrappur:nakkakrap l12_pp;
óhvassur:óhvas l12_ss;
parthallur:parthal l12_ll ;
skaftur:skaft l6_umlaut ;
skrappur:skrap l12_pp;
tilhallur:tilhal l12_ll ;
vinstrahallur:vinstrahal l12_ll ;
tippur:tip l12_pp ;
dagligur:daglig l3 ;
forsvarligur:forsvarlig l3 ;
heimspekiligur:heimspekilig l3 ;
kvamsligur:kvamslig l3 ;
minniligur:minnilig l3 ;
óhoyriligur:óhoyrilig l3 ;
skaldskapligur:skaldskaplig l3 ;
villigur:villig l3 ;
screenaður:screenað l6 ;
grúsommur:grúsom l10_m ;
allarfyrstur:allarfyrst l5 ;
eyðvalur:eyðval l1/24 ;
vesallur:vesall l1/12_ll ;
skorpnaður:skorpnað l6 ;
staðvandur:stað#van l7 ;
kókingarførur:kókingar#før l1 ;
ampaleysur:ampa#leys l2 ;
dirvisleysur:dirvis#leys l2 ;
friðleysur:frið#leys l2 ;
heiðursleysur:heiðurs#leys l2 ;
mannleysur:mann#leys l2 ;
skadleysur:skad#leys l2 ;
vápnleysur:vápn#leys l2 ;
millumlagdur:millum#lag l8 ;
inniholvdur:inni#holv l7 ;
handahagur:handa#hag l1/9 ;
eygnahagur:eygna#hag l1/9 ;
handhagur:hand#hag l1/9 ;
songhagur:song#hag l1/9 ;
orðhagur:orð#hag l1/9 ;
óhagur:ó#hag l1/9 ;
gullglæstur:gull#glæst l5/21 ;
innilæstur:inni#læst l5/21 ;
samanlæstur:saman#læst l5/21 ;
afturlæstur:aftur#læst l5/21 ;
avlæstur:av#læst l5/21 ;
ólæstur:ó#læst l5/21 ;
skarpræstur:skarp#ræst l5/21 ;
bleytræstur:bleyt#ræst l5/21 ;
